Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 18 Recordation of Honorable Discharges

30-18-1.
Recordation without fee — Sufficiency of certified copy.

A certificate of the honorable discharge of any soldier, sailor, airperson, or marine from the military, naval, air, or marine service of the United States, and in case of a sailor to include notice of separation from the United States naval service, form 553 and revisions thereto, may be recorded in the office of the town clerk or the city clerk, except in the city of Providence, where the discharge and separation notice shall be recorded in the office of the recorder of deeds. It shall be the duty of the town clerk or the city clerk, or the recorder of deeds in the city of Providence, to record any certificate and separation notice upon presentation thereof without the payment of any fee. For any purpose for which an original honorable discharge and separation notice may be required in this state, a certified copy of the record, or a form issued by the office of veterans services pursuant to §

30-18-4

shall be deemed sufficient and shall be accepted in lieu thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1923, ch. 438, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 653, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1847, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-18-1

; P.L. 2019, ch. 29, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 30, § 1.

30-18-2.
Sufficiency of reference to recorded discharge.

Any person who has served in the military, naval, or air service of the United States in the Spanish-American war, the insurrection in the Philippines, the China relief expedition, World War I, World War II, or any subsequent war in which the United States may be engaged, who has once filed evidence in a state, city, or town administrative office in this state that he or she has been honorably discharged from service or had the characterization of his or her discharge changed under the provisions of §

30-18-3

, either in accordance with the requirements of §

44-3-4

, or in accordance with the requirements of any other general or public law of this state, shall not be again required to show his or her discharge paper in making an application for tax exemption, licensing, examination, registration, aid, or relief, or in any other pertinent relationship in connection with any general or public law of this state, where evidence of honorable discharge from military, naval, or air service is required to be filed, but may refer any inquirer for verification of discharge and former filing of evidence to the office of veterans services, or other office or official where or with whom the discharge has been once recorded, which evidence shall stand so long as his or her legal residence remains in Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1452, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-18-2

; P.L. 2019, ch. 29, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 30, § 1.

30-18-3.
Change in treatment of certain discharges.

For purposes of this chapter, all former members of the armed forces who were separated from the service with a general or other than honorable discharge due solely to their sexual orientation, or gender identity or expression, may petition the office of veterans services on forms and conditions prescribed under §

30-18-4

, to have his or her discharge recorded as honorable.

Upon a determination by the office of veterans services that the member was separated from the armed forces with a general or other than honorable discharge due solely to their sexual orientation, or gender identity or expression, the director of the office of veterans services shall provide a form to be recorded pursuant to §§

30-18-1

and

30-18-2

certifying that the member’s discharge is to be treated as honorable.

Persons who have the characterization of their discharge changed under this section shall be afforded the same rights, privileges, and benefits authorized by general or public law to service members who were honorably discharged.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 29, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 30, § 2.

30-18-4.
Powers of director.

The director of the office of veterans services shall promulgate any rules, regulations, and forms as shall be necessary for the full and proper implementation of this chapter, including but not limited to:

Informing former members of the armed services that they may be entitled to benefits and privileges that were previously denied;

Recording all military discharges;

Verifying the characterization of the discharge for the purpose of benefits and privileges authorized by the general and public laws; and

Publishing and distributing materials to all state, municipal, and quasi-public entities highlighting the changes made to this chapter and the effect those changes will have on the application of the general and public laws.

The regulations shall be adopted only in accordance with the procedures established by chapter 35 of title 42.

The director of the office of veterans services shall also be empowered to enforce and administer the provisions of this chapter with regard to ensuring that each state or quasi-public agency and municipality is in compliance with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 29, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 30, § 2.